Oklahoma, session 2025, SB840.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7002 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability
shall promulgate rules establishing a micro-credential for certified
teachers who complete Certified Academic Language Therapist (CALT)
certification or Center for Effective Reading Instruction (CERI).
B. The requirements for a CALT micro-credential or a CERI
micro-credential shall include at a minimum:
1. A master’s degree;
2. Completion of a comprehensive therapy-level training;

3. Successful passage of a CALT competency examination or CERI
competency examination; and
4. Twenty-eight (28) days of instruction post the passage of
the applicable competency examination.
C. A certified teacher who earns a CALT micro-credential or a
CERI micro-credential shall be authorized to screen students for and
identify characteristics of dyslexia.
D. A micro-credential awarded pursuant to this section shall be
reflected on a teacher’s certificate to teach.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 840 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 840 Page 3